Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-648
Cancer registry; liability for providing information; limitation.

No hospital, medical doctor, osteopathic physician, or dentist nor any administrator, officer, or employee of such hospital or office in which any such professional practices take place who is in compliance with sections 81-642 to 81-649.02 and 81-663 to 81-675 shall be civilly or criminally liable for divulging the information required pursuant to such sections. The department or any of its officials or employees shall not be liable civilly or criminally for the release of information contained in the cancer registry or for the conduct or activities of any individual or entity permitted access to data of the cancer registry if done pursuant to sections 81-663 to 81-675.

Laws 1982, LB 212, § 7;

Laws 1989, LB 342, § 40;

Laws 1991, LB 703, § 73;

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 118;

Laws 2025, LB376, § 31.